Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.655.068

Statewide high school assessment in science.

(1) The statewide high school assessment in science shall be a comprehensive assessment that measures the state standards for the application of science and engineering practices, disciplinary core ideas, and crosscutting concepts in the domains of physical sciences, life sciences, earth and space sciences, and engineering design.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall develop or adopt a science assessment in accordance with RCW 28A.655.070(10) that is not biased toward persons with different learning styles, racial or ethnic backgrounds, or on the basis of gender.

(3) The superintendent of public instruction may participate with consortia of multiple states as common student learning standards and assessments in science are developed. The superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the state board of education, may modify the state learning standards and statewide student assessments in science, including the high school assessment, according to the multistate common student learning standards and assessments as long as the education committees of the legislature have opportunities for review before the modifications are adopted, as provided under RCW 28A.655.070.

(4) The statewide high school assessment under this section shall be used to demonstrate that a student meets the state standards in the science content area of the statewide student assessment until a comprehensive science assessment is required under *RCW 28A.655.061.

[ 2019 c 252 s 118; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 31 s 6; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 22 s 4; 2011 1st sp.s. c 22 s 3.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.655.061 expired August 31, 2022.

Intent—2019 c 252: See note following RCW 28A.230.710.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 31: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.

Findings—Intent—2013 2nd sp.s. c 22: "The legislature finds that the superintendent of public instruction was authorized to align the state essential academic learning requirements for mathematics, reading, writing, and communication with the common set of standards for students in grades kindergarten through twelve, known as the common core state standards, which were initiated by the governors and chief school officers of forty-five states, including Washington. The legislature further finds that Washington has joined one of two multistate consortia using a federal grant to develop new English language arts and mathematics assessments in grades three through eight and grade eleven that are, among other factors, aligned with the common core state standards and intended to demonstrate a student's career and college readiness. The legislature further finds that the assessments are required to be ready for use by the 2014-15 school year.

The legislature intends to reduce the overall costs of the state assessment system by implementing the eleventh grade English language arts and mathematics assessments being developed by a multistate consortium in which Washington is participating, maximize use of the consortium assessments by developing a tenth grade high school English language arts assessment and modifying the algebra I and geometry end-of-course assessment to be used only during the transition to the consortium-developed assessments, and reduce to three the number of assessments that will be required for students to graduate beginning with the class of 2019.

The legislature further intends that the eleventh grade consortium-developed assessments have two different student performance standards: One for the purposes of high school graduation that will be established by the state board of education and one that is intended to demonstrate a student's career and college readiness." [ 2013 2nd sp.s. c 22 s 1.]

Finding—Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 22: "(1) The legislature continues to support end-of-course assessments as a fair and practical way to measure students' knowledge and skills in high school science, but the legislature also recognizes that there are important scientific concepts, principles, and content that are not able to be captured in a single course or a single assessment. The legislature also does not wish to narrow the high school science curriculum to a singular focus on biology.

(2) However, the legislature finds that the financial resources for developing additional end-of-course assessments for high school science are not available in the 2011-2013 biennium. Nevertheless, the legislature intends to revisit this issue in the future and further intends at an appropriate time to direct the superintendent of public instruction to develop one or more end-of-course assessments in additional science subjects." [ 2011 1st sp.s. c 22 s 1.]